Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB884.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1GENERAL PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Four-Day Workweek Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Governmental unit." The following:(1) The Commonwealth.(2) A county, municipal corporation or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth.(3) A unit of the State government or of a political subdivision."Program." The Four-Day Workweek Pilot Program established under section 302."Qualifying employer." An employer that enters into an agreement to participate in the program under section 303.CHAPTER 3FOUR-DAY WORKWEEK PILOT PROGRAM AND TAX CREDITSection 301. Purpose.The purpose of the program is to promote, incentivize and support the study of the use of a four-day workweek by private and public employers in this Commonwealth.Section 302. Program and administration.20250HB0884PN0922 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Establishment.--The Four-Day Workweek Pilot Program is established in the department.(b) Duties of department.--The department shall:(1) Coordinate with the Department of Revenue to administer the program, including the tax credit authorized under section 304.(2) Encourage governmental units to institute a four-day workweek.(3) Study and gather information on the impact of the program on qualifying employers and governmental units.(4) Conduct and promote research on four-day workweeks that exist outside the program, including four-day workweeks established internationally.(5) Facilitate public discussion with qualifying employers and governmental units that have instituted a four-day workweek.(c) Information required.--A qualified employer or governmental unit that institutes a four-day workweek shall provide any information requested by the department for the purpose of the department complying with subsection (b)(3).Section 303. Application.(a) Application.--An employer may apply to participate in the program with the department on a form provided by the department.(b) Contents of application.--The application shall include:(1) A proposal to transition the applicant's workforce or a division of the applicant's workforce from a five-day workweek to a four-day workweek, which shall:(i) Apply to at least 30 employees.(ii) Affirm the applicant's commitment to the 20250HB0884PN0922 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program requirements and agree to submit any required surveys or reports as requested by the department.(2) Any other information required by the department.(c) Agreement.--The department may approve an application for participation in the program if the applicant enters an agreement that:(1) Provides that an employee transitioning to a four-day workweek will not receive a reduction in pay or benefits.(2) Allows the department to research the impact of transitioning to a four-day workweek through employee surveys, interviews and other information gathering.Section 304. Certificate of completion.(a) Department duties and restrictions.--(1) Before issuing a certificate for completion of the program, the department shall confirm that the qualifying employer maintained compliance with its proposal to participate in the program.(2) The department shall determine the amount of the tax credit approved for each qualifying employer receiving a certificate. The amount determined under this paragraph shall be stated on a certificate issued under this section.(3) The department shall determine the amount of the tax credit stated on a certificate through the use of:(i) a fixed dollar amount for each qualifying employer, not exceeding $250,000; or(ii) a $5,000 tax credit for each employee of the qualifying employer participating in the program.(4) The department may not issue certificates for credit amounts in the aggregate totaling more than $15,000,000 per fiscal year.20250HB0884PN0922 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) If the aggregate amount of tax credit certificates issued during a fiscal year totals less than the maximum amount under paragraph (4), any excess amount may be issued in a subsequent fiscal year.(b) Issuance of certificate.--Upon the completion of the program, the department shall provide a certificate to a qualifying employer demonstrating that the qualifying employer successfully completed the program and met the following requirements:(1) Participated in the program for at least one year.(2) Submitted:(i) All reports, surveys and other required documentation for the program, including information pertaining to:(A) Overall satisfaction with the program.(B) Problems with implementation or the continuation of the program.(C) Reasons for discontinuing the program.(D) Description of efficiencies produced by the program.(E) Description of any revenue savings that were a result of the program.(F) Comparison of use of leave under the program and in previous years.(G) Likelihood of continuing the program.(H) Improvements or decreases in employee mental, physical and emotional health.(I) If employees were more likely to be retained or if there was an increase in employees leaving as a result of the program.20250HB0884PN0922 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (J) Any other information deemed necessary by the department.(ii) Proof that the qualifying employer has not decreased the salaries or the benefits of the employees who participated in the program.(iii) Any other documentation required by the department.(c) Submission to Department of Revenue.--Upon receipt of the certificate, a qualifying employer may submit the certificate to the Department of Revenue and claim a credit against the State income tax in the amount stated on the certificate.(d) Guidelines.--The department shall adopt guidelines that establish criteria and procedures for:(1) Issuing certificates.(2) Determining the amount of a tax credit approved for each qualifying employer that was issued a certificate under this section.Section 305. Reports.(a) Report on certificates.--On or before January 31 of each year, the department shall submit a report to the General Assembly that identifies each qualified employer that was issued a certificate during the immediately preceding year and the amount of the tax credit stated on each certificate.(b) Program status report.--On or before December 1 of each year, the department shall submit a report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the status of the program, which shall include:(1) The number of employers participating in the program.20250HB0884PN0922 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The number of governmental units that have instituted a four-day workweek.(3) The impact of a four-day workweek on the employers participating in the program and governmental units.(4) The status of the tax credit authorized under this act.(5) Any findings or recommendations based on research conducted on four-day workweeks that exist in and outside the program.(c) Publication.--The department shall annually publish on its publicly accessible Internet website:(1) The reports required under this section.(2) The details of the qualifying employers' four-day workweek proposals.CHAPTER 5MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 501. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent an employer from increasing an employee's salary or benefits.Section 502. Expiration.This act shall expire June 28, 2029.Section 503. Effective date.This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB0884PN0922 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324